Illinois, session 104th, SB1809.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Video Gaming Act is amended by changing 5Sections 60 and 75 as follows: 6    (230 ILCS 40/60)7    Sec. 60. Imposition and distribution of tax.8    (a) A tax of 30% is imposed on net terminal income and 9shall be collected by the Board.10    (a-5) Of the tax collected under this subsection (a) from 11terminal income generated in municipalities with a population 12less than 2,000,000 and counties, five-sixths shall be 13deposited into the Capital Projects Fund and one-sixth shall 14be deposited into the Local Government Video Gaming 15Distributive Fund. 16    (a-10) Of the tax collected under subsection (a) from 17terminal income generated in municipalities with a population 18greater than or equal to 2,000,000, eleven-fifteenths shall be 19deposited into the Capital Projects Fund and four-fifteenths 20shall be deposited into the Local Government with Greater than 212,000,000 Residents Video Gaming Distributive Fund. 22    (b) Beginning on July 1, 2019, an additional tax of 3% is 23imposed on net terminal income and shall be collected by the   SB1809- 2 -LRB104 03301 LNS 13323 b1Board.2    Beginning on July 1, 2020, an additional tax of 1% is 3imposed on net terminal income and shall be collected by the 4Board.5    Beginning on July 1, 2024, an additional tax of 1% is 6imposed on net terminal income and shall be collected by the 7Board. 8    The tax collected under this subsection (b) shall be 9deposited into the Capital Projects Fund. 10    (c) Revenues generated from the play of video gaming 11terminals shall be deposited by the terminal operator, who is 12responsible for tax payments, in a specially created, separate 13bank account maintained by the video gaming terminal operator 14to allow for electronic fund transfers of moneys for tax 15payment.16    (d) Each licensed establishment, licensed truck stop 17establishment, licensed large truck stop establishment, 18licensed fraternal establishment, and licensed veterans 19establishment shall maintain an adequate video gaming fund, 20with the amount to be determined by the Board.21    (e) The State's percentage of net terminal income shall be 22reported and remitted to the Board within 15 days after the 2315th day of each month and within 15 days after the end of each 24month by the video terminal operator. A video terminal 25operator who falsely reports or fails to report the amount due 26required by this Section is guilty of a Class 4 felony and is   SB1809- 3 -LRB104 03301 LNS 13323 b1subject to termination of his or her license by the Board. Each 2video terminal operator shall keep a record of net terminal 3income in such form as the Board may require. All payments not 4remitted when due shall be paid together with a penalty 5assessment on the unpaid balance at a rate of 1.5% per month. 6(Source: P.A. 103-592, eff. 6-7-24.) 7    (230 ILCS 40/75)8    Sec. 75. Revenue sharing; Local Government Video Gaming 9Distributive Fund.10    (a) As soon as may be after the first day of each month, 11the Department of Revenue shall allocate among those 12municipalities with a population less than 2,000,000 and 13counties of this State that have not prohibited video gaming 14pursuant to Section 27 or Section 70 the amount available in 15the Local Government Video Gaming Distributive Fund, a special 16fund in the State Treasury, as provided in Section 60. The 17Department shall then certify such allocations to the State 18Comptroller, who shall pay over to those eligible 19municipalities and counties the respective amounts allocated 20to them. The amount of such funds allocable to each such 21municipality and county shall be in proportion to the tax 22revenue generated from video gaming within the eligible 23municipality or county compared to the tax revenue generated 24from video gaming Statewide.25    (a-5) As soon as may be after the first day of each month,   SB1809- 4 -LRB104 03301 LNS 13323 b1the Department of Revenue shall allocate among those 2municipalities of this State with a population greater than or 3equal to 2,000,000 that have not prohibited video gaming 4pursuant to Section 27 or 70 the amount available in the Local 5Government with Greater than 2,000,000 Residents Video Gaming 6Distributive Fund, a special fund that is created in the State 7treasury, as provided in Section 60. The Department shall then 8certify such allocations to the State Comptroller, who shall 9pay over to those eligible municipalities the respective 10amount allocated. 11    (b) The amounts allocated and paid to a municipality or 12county of this State pursuant to the provisions of this 13Section may be used for any general corporate purpose 14authorized for that municipality or county.15    (c) Upon determination by the Department that an amount 16has been paid pursuant to this Section in excess of the amount 17to which the county or municipality receiving such payment was 18entitled, the county or municipality shall, upon demand by the 19Department, repay such amount. If such repayment is not made 20within a reasonable time, the Department shall withhold from 21future payments an amount equal to such overpayment. The 22Department shall redistribute the amount of such payment to 23the county or municipality entitled thereto.24(Source: P.A. 96-34, eff. 7-13-09.) 25    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding   SB1809- 5 -LRB104 03301 LNS 13323 b1Section 5.1030 as follows: 2    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)3    Sec. 5.1030. The Local Government with Greater than 42,000,000 Residents Video Gaming Distributive Fund. 5    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 6becoming law.